Florida, session 2026, HB1287.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (6) of section 448.24, Florida
Statutes, is amended, and subsection (8) is added to that
section, to read:
448.24 Duties and rights.—
(6) A No labor pool may not shall restrict the right of a
day laborer to accept a permanent position with a third-party
user to whom the laborer is referred for temporary work, or to
restrict the right of such a third-party user to offer such
employment to an employee of the labor pool. If a third-party
user directly employs a laborer for work, a labor pool may not
charge the third-party user a placement fee However, nothing
shall restrict the labor pool from receiving a reasonable
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1287-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1287 2026
placement fee from the third-party user.
(8) A labor pool that is located, operates, or transacts
business in this state shall register annually with the
Department of Commerce. The department may adopt rules to
implement this subsection.
Section 2. Subsection (4) is added to section 448.25,
Florida Statutes, to read:
448.25 Remedies; damages; costs.—
(4) In addition to any damages awarded for an action
brought pursuant to this section, the court shall award
reasonable attorney fees and costs to the prevailing party.
Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1287-00